Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. By July 1, 2027, the health care authority shall develop and submit a state plan amendment to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to allow for individuals who have countable income equal to or below 300 percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services to be eligible for enrollment under the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW.--- END ---